Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5116.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 26.04.180 and 1985 c 82 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The county auditor may issue the marriage license at the time of application, but shall issue such license no later than the third full day following the date of the application. A marriage license issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter may not be used until three days after the date of application and shall become void if the marriage is not solemnized within ((sixty))60 days of the date of the issuance of the license, and the county auditor shall notify the applicant in writing of this requirement at the time of issuance of the license.(2) The county auditor shall issue the marriage license at the time of application, and such license may be used immediately, in the event that a written statement from a physician licensed to practice medicine in the state is first provided to the county auditor, which states that one or both of the applicants is at risk of imminent death or incapacity.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. This act may be known and cited as the medical emergency marriage act.--- END ---